Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 1. Wyoming State Guard and Council of Defense

§ 19-10-101.
Organization by governor; appointment of council; removal; control.

If the national guard of Wyoming is ordered into the service of the United States, the governor may organize and maintain within this state during that period, under such regulations as the secretary of defense may prescribe, such military forces as may be authorized by the secretary of defense or as the governor deems necessary for the defense of the state. The forces shall be known as the Wyoming state guard. Insofar as practicable, the existing laws, rules and regulations governing the national guard shall be applied to the control of the Wyoming state guard. The force shall be of such strength as directed by the secretary of defense, with such expansion in the future as may be authorized. The Wyoming state guard shall be armed, trained and equipped in such manner as may be prescribed by the secretary of defense or the governor of Wyoming.

For the purpose of coordinating desirable national defense activities, the governor shall appoint a Wyoming state council of defense. The council, subject to the approval of the governor, may organize necessary subordinate branches and establish rules and regulations for the operation of the council and subordinate branches, and assist in all matters pertaining to the Wyoming state guard and other state or national defense activities not otherwise covered by law. Appointment to the council of defense is not limited by any requirements as to prior military or naval service. The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The adjutant general of Wyoming shall be in control of the Wyoming state guard, subordinate only to the governor in matters pertaining thereto. He is further charged with the responsibility of coordinating all other defense activities as are provided by W.S.

19-8-103

and

19-10-101

through

19-10-108

.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 19-79; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-3-101

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to ordering of national guard into service of United States, see §

19-9-204

.

§ 19-10-102.
Pay and allowances.

Members of the Wyoming state guard, when serving under orders of the governor of Wyoming, shall receive out of the general fund of Wyoming not otherwise appropriated the same pay and allowances authorized for personnel of equal rank in the national guard.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 49, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 19-80; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-3-102

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-10-103.
Requisition of arms and supplies.

The governor may requisition or purchase from the department of defense or other sources such arms, equipment and supplies as are necessary to equip the Wyoming state guard and may make available to such forces the facilities and equipment of state armories and other state premises and property as are available and necessary.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 49, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 19-81; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-3-103

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-10-104.
Guard not required to serve outside state; exceptions.

The Wyoming state guard is not required to serve outside the boundaries of this state except:

Upon request of the governor of another state, the governor of this state may order any portion of the force to assist the military or police forces of the other state which are actually engaged in the defense of the other state. The forces may be recalled at the discretion of the governor of Wyoming;

As provided by W.S. 19-8-103(b); or

As ordered by the governor of this state in accordance with the provisions of the Emergency Management Assistance Compact.

No provision relative to the Wyoming state guard shall be construed as authorizing those forces, or any part thereof, to be called, ordered or in any way drafted into the military service of the United States, but no person is exempt from military service under the laws of the United States by reason of enlistment or commission in the Wyoming state guard.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 49, §§ 4, 6; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-82, 19-83; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-3-104

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2003, ch. 21, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to the Emergency Management Assistance Compact Act, see §

19-13-401

et seq.

§ 19-10-105.
Oath; term of enlistment; eligibility; appointment of officers; removal; employees of state or political subdivisions.

The oath to be taken by members of the Wyoming state guard, shall be substantially the same as that prescribed for members of the Wyoming national guard, substituting the words “Wyoming state guard” where necessary.

No person may be enlisted or reenlisted in such service for more than two (2) years.

All qualified residents of Wyoming, and any nonresident who is accepted into the service, between seventeen (17) and seventy (70) years of age and of good moral character are eligible for membership in the Wyoming state guard.

The officers of the Wyoming state guard shall be appointed and commissioned by the governor under such regulations as he may prescribe and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

No member of the Wyoming state guard who is an officer or employee of the state of Wyoming, or a county, city, town, school district or other political subdivision thereof shall suffer any loss of pay, vacation privilege, seniority or efficiency rating because of serving in the state guard under orders of the governor.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 49, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 19-84; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-3-105

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4; 1999, ch. 138, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to oath required of national guard members, see §

19-9-301

.

Leave of absences are to be paid. —

The legislature intended for employees and officers to be paid while they are on military leaves of absence pursuant to subsection (a); that payment, so long as it is reasonable, may be differential or full pay. Lancto v. City of Rawlins, 892 P.2d 800,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty as applied to militiamen, 18 ALR2d 268.

Compensation of public employees while in military service, 22 ALR2d 1134.

Validity and construction of state statutes requiring employers to compensate employees for absences occasioned by military service, 8 ALR4th 704.

Reemployment of discharged servicemen, 9 ALR Fed 225.

What circumstances constitute laches barring federal judicial review of allegedly wrongful discharge from military service, 100 ALR Fed 821.

§ 19-10-106.
Application of Military Service Relief Act.

The Military Service Relief Act, W.S.

19-11-101

through

19-11-125

, shall apply to members of the Wyoming state guard.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1; 2018 ch. 58, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “19-11-125” for “19-11-124.”

§ 19-10-107.
Worker's compensation.

In the event of disability or death resulting from an injury while in state active duty under orders of the governor, members of the Wyoming state guard are entitled to the same benefits provided for employees under the provisions of the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act. Benefits shall be paid out of the general fund of Wyoming upon certification by the state council of defense.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 49, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 19-85; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-3-106

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2003, ch. 19, § 1.

Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act. —

See §§ 27-14-101(a), 27-14-102(a)(xxvii).

§ 19-10-108.
Courts-martial jurisdiction; exemption from liability for civil or criminal acts; exception.

Whenever the Wyoming state guard, or any part thereof, is serving under orders of the governor, the provisions of this act relating to military courts and justice shall apply and are in full force and effect with respect to the Wyoming state guard.

The members of the Wyoming state guard shall be afforded the same immunities from civil liability afforded the Wyoming national guard pursuant to W.S. 19-9-401(c).

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 49, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 19-86; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-3-108

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 19-7-101(a)(xii).

Severability. —

Section 10, ch. 49, Laws 1951, reads: “If any of the provisions of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions of applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared severable.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Courts-martial jurisdiction over members of armed forces for “civilian” offenses, 14 ALR Fed 152.

§ 19-10-109.
Disposal of state-owned uniforms and equipment; presentation of uniforms to former members.

The adjutant general of Wyoming may present to former members of the Wyoming state guard as partial compensation for their services, to be retained by the former members as their own personal property without cost or charge, such state-owned items of uniform as designated by the adjutant general.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 47, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 19-87; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-3-108

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-10-110.
Disposal of state-owned uniforms and equipment; public or private sale.

The adjutant general of Wyoming may sell at public or private sale all state-owned equipment, supplies and items of uniform, or any uniforms not claimed by members of the Wyoming state guard within six (6) months or until all state guard members entitled to the uniforms have received the uniforms, as were acquired for the use and convenience of the Wyoming state guard. The equipment, supplies, and items of uniform not sold or disposed of, shall be retained for the use and convenience of the military department of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 47, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 19-88; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-3-109

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-10-111.
Disposal of state-owned uniforms and equipment; disposition of proceeds of sale.

All proceeds from the sale or sales of state guard equipment, supplies and items of uniform or money from any source shall be deposited with the state treasurer to be credited to the general fund.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 47, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 19-89; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-3-110

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

Cross references. —

For similar provisions, see §

19-7-201

.

§ 19-10-112.
Honorary promotion upon retirement.

Members of the Wyoming state guard may be promoted by the governor or the adjutant general to the next higher grade on the occasion of their retirement from service under the following conditions:

The member has honorably served either a total of at least twenty (20) years in the federal military or the Wyoming state guard combined, provided that no period less than ten (10) years in the Wyoming state guard shall be credited toward these requirements; and

The honorary promotion is requested by the member or the member’s commander.

A promotion under this section is only honorary and has no impact on the retirement pay or other monetary benefits of those promoted under this section.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1.